Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3-173, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 306, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 3-173), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3-173. A. There is hereby re-created to continue until
July 1, 2026 July 1, 2029, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Oklahoma Advisory Council on Indian
Education.
B. The Council shall:

1. Make recommendations to the State Board of Education and the
Superintendent of Public Instruction in educational matters
affecting the education of Native American students;
2. Promote educational opportunities and improvement of the
quality of education provided to Native American students throughout
the state;
3. Advocate for Native American students in the state; and
4. Monitor and evaluate how the public education system of the
state impacts Native American students.
C. The Council shall be composed of eighteen (18) members as
follows:
1. Five members who shall each represent an Indian tribe in the
state, of which at least one shall represent an Indian tribe which
has an enrollment of less fewer than ten thousand (10,000) members
who reside in the state, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives from a list of nominations submitted by the elected
executive leaders of different Indian tribes in the state;
2. Four members who shall each represent the tribal education
departments of an Indian tribe in the state, appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate from a list of nominations
submitted by the elected executive leaders of different Indian
tribes in the state;
3. One member who shall represent the Oklahoma Council for
Indian Education, appointed by the Governor;
4. Two members who shall represent two different statewide
organizations representing public school teachers, appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
5. One member who shall represent a statewide organization
representing public school superintendents, appointed by the Speaker
of the House of Representatives;
6. One member who shall represent Oklahoma tribal colleges,
appointed by the Chancellor of Higher Education;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1721 Page 2

7. The Director of the Native American Cultural and Educational
Authority, or designee;
8. The Chancellor of Higher Education, or designee;
9. The Director of the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education, or designee; and
10. The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or designee.
D. 1. Appointments to the Council shall be made by September
1, 2023. The first meeting of the Council shall be called by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction. At the first meeting, the
members of the Council shall elect a chair and vice chair from among
the members. Meetings of the Council shall be held at least
quarterly at the call of the chair. Members shall serve at the
pleasure of their appointing authorities. A majority of the members
of the Council shall constitute a quorum to transact business, but
no vacancy shall impair the right of the remaining members to
exercise all of the powers of the Council. A vacancy on the Council
shall be filled by the original appointing authority. A vacancy on
the Council in a seat representing an Indian tribe in the state or
the tribal education department of an Indian tribe in the state may
be filled by the original appointing authority from a list of
nominations submitted by the elected executive leaders of Indian
tribes in the state. Appointments to fill any vacancy on the
Council shall be made within three (3) months following the vacancy.
The State Department of Education, Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education, and the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall provide staff, support, and information as requested
by the Council.
2. a. Each member appointed to the Council representing an
Indian tribe, tribal education department, or other
tribal entity shall be a duly authorized
representative of that tribe, tribal education
department, or tribal entity at the time of
appointment and throughout the duration of his or her
appointment. Authorized status shall be granted by
the elected executive leaders or the governing body of
the tribe or entity.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1721 Page 3

b. A member’s service on the Council shall automatically
cease if he or she no longer serves as the authorized
representative of the tribe, tribal education
department, or other tribal entity the member was
appointed to represent. The appointing authority
shall be notified in writing by the tribe, tribal
education department, or other tribal entity of any
such change in authorization. Upon receipt of such
notice, the position shall be deemed vacant, and the
vacancy shall be filled as provided for in this
section.
c. Any member of the Council on the effective date of
this act shall be deemed to meet the requirements of
this paragraph and may continue to serve unless and
until he or she is no longer the authorized
representative of the tribe, tribal education
department, or other tribal entity the member was
appointed to represent.
E. Members of the Council shall receive no compensation for
serving on the Council but shall receive travel reimbursement as
follows:
1. State employees who are members of the Council shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties by their respective agencies in accordance with the State
Travel Reimbursement Act; and
2. All other members of the Council shall be reimbursed by the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with the
State Travel Reimbursement Act.
F. The Council shall act in accordance with the provisions of
the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
G. Members who serve on the Council shall be exempt from the
dual-office-holding prohibitions of Section 6 of Title 51 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1721 Page 4

H. The Council shall have the following duties:
1. Identify strategies for developing an efficient and reliable
process of communications between Oklahoma education entities,
educators, tribal organizations, and other interested parties;
2. Identify and disseminate research-based, measurable
criteria, both behavioral and academic, by which the success and
efficacy of the education offered to Native American students in
Oklahoma may be measured;
3. Analyze data to ensure that education agencies in Oklahoma
continue to address the education needs of Native American students;
4. Encourage and promote Native American educational leadership
at all levels of the education system; and
5. Make recommendations to the State Board of Education for
programs that will help achieve the purposes of the Oklahoma
Advisory Council on Indian Education Act.
I. The Council shall evaluate and make an annual report on the
effectiveness of the public education system in Oklahoma in meeting
the needs of Native American students in Oklahoma. The report shall
be electronically submitted to the State Board of Education. The
report shall also contain a summary of the findings made by the
Council pursuant to subsection H of this section, a summary of all
data collected by the Council, a summary of the means by which all
data was collected by the Council, and any other information deemed
necessary by the Council.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1721 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 9th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1721 Page 6